Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-703
Purpose.

Cooperative, nonprofit, membership corporations may be organized for the purpose of engaging in rural electrification and the furnishing of electric energy to persons in rural areas not served with electrical energy through existing facilities within such rural areas.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 3, p. 203;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-803;

R.S.1943, § 70-703.